Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.104

Professional development funding for new teachers—Districts participating in evaluation system in RCW 28A.405.100 (2) and (6).

If funds are provided for professional development activities designed specifically for first through third-year teachers, the funds shall be allocated first to districts participating in the evaluation systems in RCW 28A.405.100 (2) and (6) before the required implementation date under that section.

[ 2010 c 235 s 205.]

NOTES:

Finding—2010 c 235: See note following RCW 28A.405.245.